Utah statutes.
19-6-1103.   Rulemaking.
In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act,
the board may make rules to implement this part, including:
(1)  a streamlined application procedure designed to encourage and allow reuse
of an industrial byproduct in a public project; and
(2)  reasonable, objective standards for demonstrating, without regard to the
industrial byproduct's source, the safety of the reuse and future reuse of an
industrial byproduct.
